Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 1

Registration by Election Commissions

2-2-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Administrator of elections” means the chief administrative officer appointed by the county election commission. The “administrator of elections” created by this section is the immediate successor to the “registrar-at-large” for each county;

“Commission” means the county election commission unless another intent is clearly shown; and

“Deputy” means all office personnel or clerical assistants other than the administrator of elections and is the immediate successor to “deputy registrar.”

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-201; Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21, 22.

Cross-References. Administrators of elections, title 2, ch. 12, part 2.

Duties of coordinator of elections, §2-11-202.

Law Reviews.

Rethinking the Right to Vote Under State Constitutions, 67 Vand. L. Rev. En Banc 189 (2014).

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

The Origins and Constitutionality of State Unit Voting in the Electoral College, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 2099 (2001).

Collateral References.

Constitutionality of statutes in relation to registration before voting at election or primary. 91 A.L.R. 349.

2-2-102. Qualified voter.

A citizen of the United States eighteen (18) years of age or older who is a resident of this state is a qualified voter unless the citizen is disqualified under the provisions of this title or under a judgment of infamy pursuant to §40-20-112.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1973, ch. 327, § 2; T.C.A., § 2-202; Acts 1981, ch. 342, § 2; 1994, ch. 919, § 1.

Cross-References. Acts purging registration, §2-2-106.

Duties of election coordinator, §2-11-202.

Judgment of infamy, §40-20-112.

Notice of infamy, §40-20-113.

Registration information, §2-2-116.

Restoration of suffrage, §§2-2-139,40-29-101.

Suffrage for persons convicted of infamous crimes, §2-19-143.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, §§ 4, 6.

Law Reviews.

The Origins and Constitutionality of State Unit Voting in the Electoral College, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 2099 (2001).

Residency Requirements — Application of “Compelling State Interest” Test, 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 114 (1972).

The Right to Vote Under State Constitutions (Joshua A. Douglas), 67 Vand. L. Rev. 89 (2014).

Attorney General Opinions. “Qualified voter” under city charter, OAG 99-077 (4/5/99).

Right of non-resident property owners to vote in annexation referendum. OAG 13-106, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 111 (12/20/13).

T.C.A. §8-8-102(a)(3) imposes two requirements on potential candidates who seek to qualify for election or appointment to the office of sheriff. First, the candidate must be a “qualified voter of the county,” which requires the candidate to satisfy the qualifications in T.C.A. §2-2-102, but does not require the candidate to be registered to vote. Second, the candidate must have been a “resident of the county for one (1) full year” prior to the qualification deadline. OAG 17-36, 2017 Tenn. AD LEXIS 36 (8/30/2017).

2-2-103. Effect of change of residence within thirty (30) days of election.

If a registered voter moves such voter's residence from this state after the thirtieth day before an election for electors for president and vice president and for that reason does not satisfy the registration requirements of such voter's new residence for that election, the voter continues to be a registered voter but only for electors for president and vice president in that election in the voting precinct in which the voter was last registered. The voter may vote either in person or by absentee ballot.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-203.

2-2-104. Persons entitled to register.

The following persons may register permanently under this title:

A person who is a qualified voter when such person applies to register;

A person residing in an area within this state which has been ceded to the federal government if the person is otherwise qualified to vote; and

A person who will be eighteen (18) years of age on or before the date of the next election after the person applies to register and who is otherwise eligible to register.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-204; Acts 1994, ch. 919, § 2.

Collateral References.

Validity of statute requiring proof and disclosure of information as condition of registration to vote. 48 A.L.R.6th 181.

2-2-105. Permanency of registration.

Registration of voters under this title is permanent. When a voter has once been registered under this title or under any previous permanent registration law if the voter would be eligible under this title, it is unnecessary for such voter to register again unless the voter's registration is purged under this title or was purged under a previous permanent registration law.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-205.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 6.

2-2-106. Acts purging registration — Notice.

The registration of a person shall be purged:

At the request of the voter;

Ninety (90) days after a change of name for any reason, except by marriage or divorce;

If the voter dies;

Upon receiving information that a person has been convicted of an infamous crime as defined by § 40-20-112 from the state coordinator of elections, the district attorney general, United States attorney, clerk of the court that entered the conviction, or other source upon verification by the clerk of the convicting court; or

Upon written confirmation from the voter that the voter has changed the voter's address to an address outside the county of registration or has registered to vote in another jurisdiction.

It is the responsibility of the county election commission to implement an address verification program to identify any voter who has changed the voter's address of residence without notifying the election commission. The address verification program shall conform to the intent of this section and this part and the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. § 20501 et seq., formerly 42 U.S.C. § 1973gg et seq.). The county election commission shall complete the address verification process at least on a biennial basis, but may do so annually. The county election commission shall complete any such process no later than ninety (90) days before a federal election.

To identify any voter who has changed the voter's address of residence without notifying the county election commission, the address verification program implemented by the county election commission under subsection (b) may use any of the following, or any combination of the following, sources:

The return of mail sent by the county election commission to the voter at the voter's address of registration. The mail sent to the voter may include, without limitation, a non-forwardable verification card, a non-forwardable voter registration card, or a notice mailed pursuant to § 2-3-105 or § 2-5-211;

The United States postal service's national change of address service; and

Information received from the coordinator of elections as a result of a comparison of voter registration addresses with the residential addresses of record with the department of safety. To conduct the comparison of residential addresses, the department of safety and the coordinator of elections may retrieve the data applicable to the voter's address of residence and match the voter's registration address with data applicable to the voter's matching record with the department of safety. The coordinator of elections may obtain from the department of safety a list of all persons who have surrendered their Tennessee driver license while obtaining a driver license from another state.

If, as a result of the address verification program, the county election commission determines that a voter may have changed the voter's address of residence, the administrator of elections shall mail a forwardable confirmation notice to the voter at the address of registration with a postage prepaid, pre-addressed return form on which the voter may verify or correct the new address information.

Upon the mailing of a notice pursuant to subsection (c), the administrator of elections shall place the registration in inactive status and then take one (1) of the following steps as appropriate to the response of the voter or the failure of the voter to respond to the notice:

If the voter returns the form or otherwise notifies the election commission in writing and indicates that there is in fact no change in address, the voter's registration will be returned to active status;

If the voter returns the form or otherwise notifies the election commission in writing and indicates a new address within the county of current registration, the voter's registration will be updated to reflect the new address of residence;

If the voter returns the form or otherwise notifies the election commission in writing and indicates a new address in another county, the administrator of elections shall remove the voter's name from the voter registration rolls, and shall advise the voter how to register in the new county of residence;

If a voter fails to respond to a confirmation notice and the voter in fact does not have a new address or has a new address within the same precinct, the voter may appear at the voter's polling place and vote in any election held between the time the notice was sent and the second regular November election held after the notice was sent. When appearing to vote, the person will be required to make written affirmation on the affidavit as described in § 2-7-140 and vote according to the procedures outlined in that section;

If a voter fails to respond to a confirmation notice and if the voter has changed the voter's address of residence to an address within the same county but in another precinct, the voter may correct the registration and vote at the appropriate polling place for the voter's new residence in any election held between the time the notice was sent and the second regular November election held after the notice was sent. When appearing to vote, the person will be required to make written affirmation on the affidavit as described in § 2-7-140 and vote according to the procedures outlined in that section;

If a voter fails to respond to a confirmation notice and if the voter has changed the voter's address of residence to an address outside the county of registration, the voter may not vote until such voter becomes properly registered in the new county of residence except as provided in § 2-7-115; and

A voter may use a response to a confirmation notice to update the voter's registration to reflect a change in the voter's name.

If the voter fails to respond to the confirmation notice, does not appear to vote, and does not update the voter registration between the time the notice is sent and the second regular November election held after the notice was sent, the administrator of elections shall purge the voter's registration.

Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the administrator shall send a voter's registration card by non-forwardable mail.

Voter registrations that are inactive pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not be included in a county's total of registered voters. The administrator shall maintain a separate total of voters on inactive status.

Any person who intentionally makes a false affirmation pursuant to this section violates § 2-19-107 and shall be punished as provided in § 2-19-107.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1976, ch. 407, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-206; Acts 1981, ch. 345, § 4; 1993, ch. 518, §§ 19, 21; 1994, ch. 947, § 8; 1995, ch. 76, § 2; 1996, ch. 735, §§ 1, 2; 1997, ch. 550, § 1; 2011, ch. 161, § 1; 2017, ch. 245, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (b), in the second sentence, substituted “The address” for “This address” at the beginning, substituted “shall conform to” for “shall conform with”, and substituted “compiled in 52 U.S.C. § 20501 et seq. (formerly 42 U.S.C. § 1973gg et seq.)” for “compiled as 42 U.S.C. § 1973gg et seq.” at the end; and substituted “no later than ninety (90) days before a federal election” for “not later than ninety (90) days before the regular August election” at the end of the last sentence; added present (c)(1) and designated the former paragraph as (c)(2); and, in present (c)(2), substituted “voter may have” for “voter has”, substituted the second occurrence of “voter” for “registrant”, and deleted the former second sentence which read: “The county election commission shall also follow this process if indications exist that the voter may no longer reside at the address at which the voter is registered, such as the voter's failure to vote, or otherwise update the voter's registration over a period of two (2) consecutive regular November elections.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 245, § 6. May 2, 2017.

Cross-References. Duties of election coordinator, §2-11-202.

Judgment of infamy, §40-20-112.

Notice of infamy, §40-20-113.

Qualified voters, §2-2-102.

Registration information, §2-2-116.

Restoration of suffrage, §§2-2-139,40-29-101.

Suffrage for persons convicted of infamous crimes, §2-19-143.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 6.

2-2-107. Precinct or municipality of registration — Change of habitation without change of residence.

A person shall be registered as a voter of the precinct in which the person is a resident, and, if provided for by municipal charter or general law, may also be registered in a municipality in which the person owns real property in order to participate in that municipality's elections.

Notwithstanding any provision of this title to the contrary, if a person's residence is located on real property which is located in both a municipality and in an unincorporated area in the county in which the municipality is located, then such person shall be eligible to vote in municipal elections if municipal taxes are assessed on the portion of real property located within the municipality. In a county having a metropolitan form of government, “unincorporated area,” as used in this subdivision (a)(2), includes an area outside the boundaries of any of the smaller cities within the metropolitan government.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if a municipal charter provides for property rights voting, no more than two (2) persons shall be entitled to vote based upon the ownership of an individual tract of property regardless of the number of property owners.

If a voter moves such voter's habitation outside the precinct where the person is a registered voter but continues to be a resident of the precinct, the county election commission shall determine the person's rights and duties on the basis of the location of the person's last residence in the precinct before the person's change of habitation.

In order to timely correct voter registration records, municipalities which have annexed territory or changed any district or ward boundary shall provide each county election commission affected by the change with the following:

Maps depicting the area;

A copy of the ordinance or resolution calling for the change denoting, if applicable, which wards or districts the annexed or changed area will be a part of; and

A copy of the census taken for the annexation, if available, with names and addresses within the annexed area.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1978, ch. 944, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-207; Acts 1996, ch. 765, § 1; 1999, ch. 197, § 1; 2001, ch. 413, § 13; 2003, ch. 134, § 1; 2014, ch. 724, § 5.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment, in (a)(2), rewrote the first sentence which read: “Notwithstanding any provision of this title to the contrary, if a person's residence is located on real property which is located in both a municipality and in an unincorporated area in the county in which the municipality is located, then such person shall be eligible to register either in the municipal precinct or the county precinct in which such property is located.”, and deleted the former last sentence which read: “The election by a person to register in the municipality or the unincorporated area of the county is a one-time election.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 724, § 12. April 16, 2014.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, §§ 4, 6.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Annexation Law: History, Analysis, and Proposed Amendments (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 55 Tenn. L. Rev. 577 (1989).

2-2-108. Commission offices — Hours — Functions.

Each commission shall have an office in the county courthouse or another public building and such other locations as the commission may designate for registering voters and performing other functions required or authorized by law. The main office shall be open at least from nine o'clock a.m. (9:00 a.m.) until four o'clock p.m. (4:00 p.m.) on such day or days each week as the commission directs.

In counties with administrators of elections certified under § 2-11-202(b), who receive at least ninety percent (90%) or eighty-five percent (85%) of the assessor of property's salary pursuant to § 2-12-208(a)(1) or (a)(3) [now § 2-12-208(a)], respectively, the commission office shall be open during the hours specified in this subsection (a) at least five (5) days per week. In counties with administrators certified under § 2-11-202(b), who receive at least eighty percent (80%) of the assessor of property's salary pursuant to § 2-12-208(a)(2) [now § 2-12-208(a)], the commission office shall be open during the hours specified in this subsection (a) at least four (4) days per week. The hours such offices shall be open established by this subsection (a) shall be the minimum hours, and nothing in subsection (a) shall be construed as prohibiting the election commission from requiring such offices to stay open for additional hours per day or days per week.

The county election commission may establish additional hours when the main office shall be open to perform the commission's statutory functions. The office shall be open as many days a week as necessary to register qualified registrants, to replace lost registration cards, to transfer or change registrations and to perform the other duties of the commission.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1974, ch. 642, §§ 1, 4; T.C.A., § 2-208; Acts 1980, ch. 712, § 1; 1982, ch. 635, § 1; 1986, ch. 930, § 2; 1991, ch. 75, § 1; 1994, ch. 919, § 3; 1996, ch. 1081, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

The bracketed references in subdivision (a)(2) are set out to reflect amendments to §2-12-208(a) by Acts 2005, ch. 470 which deleted the former subdivision designations.

2-2-109. Registration periods.

A qualified voter may register or have the voter's registration altered at the commission office at any time the office is open, except that applications for registration shall not be processed for twenty-nine (29) days before an election, except as provided in subsection (b); provided, that a qualified voter may file a mail registration form by postmarking the registration form or submitting the registration form thirty (30) days before an election. A mail registration form lacking a postmark, but signed and dated at least thirty (30) days before an election, shall be timely filed if it is received by the county election commission no later than the twenty-seventh day prior to the election. A qualified voter may correct a deficient but timely filed mail registration form if the voter files a completed registration application or otherwise corrects the deficiency on or before the next regularly scheduled November general election. The administrator of elections shall register the person to vote if the person is otherwise eligible to register. Deficient registrations not corrected on or before the next regularly scheduled November general election shall no longer be considered deficient and shall be void. The administrator shall be empowered to update an existing registration until no later than five (5) days before an election to place it within the correct precinct in the county when a voter changes the voter's address through the process described in § 2-7-140.

When the thirtieth day before an election falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, applications for registration shall be accepted and processed the next business day following such Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday. This extends the deadline for applications for registration completed at the county election commission office as well as the deadline for having a by-mail registration form postmarked.

When elections are being held in two (2) or more voting districts within any county, the time period for such registration or alteration of permanent registration records shall be calculated for each election separately, and such registration or alteration of permanent registration records is not prohibited in one (1) election because it is twenty-nine (29) days prior to another within the same county.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-209; Acts 1980, ch. 678, § 1; 1980, ch. 728, § 1; 1994, ch. 919, § 4; 1995, ch. 76, § 3; 1997, ch. 550, § 3; 2000, ch. 756, § 1; 2001, ch. 413, § 9; 2002, ch. 698, § 3; 2007, ch. 125, § 1; 2008, ch. 928, § 1; 2013, ch. 179, § 2; 2013, ch. 231, § 1; 2014, ch. 724, § 2; 2016, ch. 827, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment, in (a), substituted “if the voter files a completed registration application or otherwise corrects the deficiency no later than five (5) days before the next regularly scheduled November general election” for “if the voter comes to the commission office no later than five (5) days before the election and presents the rejection of registration notice to the administrator of elections” at the end of the third sentence, added the present fourth sentence, and substituted “The administrator of elections” for “The administrator” at the beginning of the penultimate sentence.

The 2016 amendment, in (a), substituted “on or before the next” for “no later than five (5) days before the next” preceding “regularly scheduled November general election” in the third sentence; added the present fourth sentence; substituted “on or before the next” for “prior to the five (5) days before the next” preceding “regularly scheduled November general election” in the present fifth sentence, and at the end of the same sentence substituted “void” for “rejected”; and deleted the former fifth sentence, which read: “The administrator of elections shall register the person to vote if the person is otherwise eligible to register.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 724, § 12. April 16, 2014.

Acts 2016, ch. 827, § 7. April 21, 2016.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Annexation Law: History, Analysis, and Proposed Amendments (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 55 Tenn. L. Rev. 577 (1989).

Attorney General Opinions. Where the thirtieth day before an election falls on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, the deadline for registering to vote is the immediately preceding day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, OAG 06-171 (11/22/06).

2-2-110. Registration of those unable to appear at commission office.

The commission may provide for the registration of persons who cannot appear in person due to illness or other good cause by sending the administrator of elections to their homes or other place where they are within the county to register such persons.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-210.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

2-2-111. Supplemental registrations generally.

The commission in any county may hold such supplemental registrations as it deems necessary before any election in locations other than the commission office.

In addition to any supplemental voter registration otherwise required by this chapter, the county election commission, or its designee, in each county shall conduct at least one (1) supplemental voter registration each year at every public and private high school in the county, for the purpose of registration of those persons who will be eligible to vote in the next election. The publication requirements of § 2-2-114 shall not apply to the registration required by this subsection (b).

As used in this section, “designees” does not include representatives of a nationally recognized political party or representatives of an organization which actively seeks to influence the outcome of an election.

In addition to any supplemental voter registration otherwise required by this chapter, the county election commission, or its designee, shall conduct a supplemental voter registration when a planned and scheduled group naturalization ceremony is held within the county. The county election commission shall attend the supplemental voter registration in person or shall send one (1) or more assistant registrars or other designees in their stead to register such new citizens. The publication requirements of § 2-2-114 shall not apply to the registration required by this subsection (d).

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-211; Acts 1980, ch. 715, §§ 1-4; ch. 772, § 1; 1982, ch. 588, § 1; ch. 719, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 335, § 1; T.C.A. §2-2-112(b); Acts 1991, ch. 103, §§ 1, 3; 2004, ch. 472, § 1; 2013, ch. 231, § 2; 2018, ch. 842, § 1.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added the last sentence in (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 842, § 6. April 26, 2018.

2-2-112. Online voter registration system.

Beginning as soon as practicable but no later than September 1, 2017, an applicant may submit an online voter registration application using the procedures set forth in this section.

The coordinator of elections shall establish a web site which permits an applicant to:

Submit a voter registration application, including first-time voter registration applications and updates to current voter registration records;

Submit information necessary to establish an applicant's eligibility to vote, pursuant to § 2-2-104, which includes the information required for the uniform statewide voter registration application pursuant to § 2-2-116; and

Swear or affirm to the oath required pursuant to § 2-2-116.

The online voter registration system shall use a unique identifier for each applicant to prevent unauthorized persons from altering a voter's registration information. Any unique identifier, including driver license and social security numbers, shall be confidential and not subject to the open records law, compiled in title 10, chapter 7.

The online voter registration system shall compare identifying information submitted by the applicant, such as name, date of birth, Tennessee driver license number, or Tennessee identification number, with information maintained by the department of safety to confirm that the applicant has a matching record with the department of safety.

If the online voter registration system identifies a matching record for the applicant with the department of safety, then the applicant may complete the online voter registration form as prescribed by the coordinator of elections and electronically submit the form.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the department of safety and the coordinator of elections are authorized to retrieve the data applicable to the applicant's matching record and transmit such data to the automated electoral system (AES) maintained by the coordinator of elections pursuant to § 2-2-301, along with the digital signature of the applicant on file with the department of safety. The applicant's digital signature on file with the department of safety satisfies the signature requirement of § 2-2-116 for purposes of registering to vote or updating an existing voter registration record.

If the applicant's name and date of birth or other identifying information provided by the applicant cannot be verified by comparing the records of the department of safety, or if the applicant indicates that the applicant has not been issued a Tennessee driver license or Tennessee identification card, the online voter registration system may direct the applicant to complete, print, sign, and date the application and mail the application to the county election commission office in the applicant's county of residence to be processed.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the administrator of elections shall process the application pursuant to § 2-2-120.

The coordinator of elections may promulgate policies or rules to effectuate the provisions of this section, including, but not limited to, entering into agreements with the commissioner of safety.

Acts 2016, ch. 936, § 1; 2017, ch. 245, § 3.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 936 § 1 enacted a new section, 2-2-142, but the section has been redesignated as section 2-2-112 by authority of the Code Commission.

Compiler's Notes. Former §2-2-112 (Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-212; Acts 1980, ch. 715, §§ 1-4; ch. 772, § 1; 1982, ch. 588, § 1; 1982, ch. 719, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 335, § 1; 1991, ch. 103, §§ 2, 3), concerning supplemental registrations in particular counties, was repealed by Acts 1997, ch. 558, § 13.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Beginning as soon as practicable but no later than September 1, 2017” for “Beginning July 1, 2017” at the beginning of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 936, § 2. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 245, § 6. May 2, 2017.

Law Reviews.

New Kind of Voter Suppression in Modern Elections, 49 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1019 (Summer 2019).

2-2-113. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §2-2-113 (Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-213), concerning precinct registration by precinct registrars, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 919, § 5.

2-2-114. Newspaper notice of commission office location — Notices of precinct or supplemental registrations.

Not less than forty-five (45) days before any election, the commission shall publish, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, a notice of the exact location and telephone number of its office or offices and the hours and days it is open.

Whenever a county has a supplemental registration, the commission shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, a notice of the exact location and the time for such supplemental registration. The commission shall publish the notice not less than three (3) days before the beginning of each supplemental registration. The commission shall include in the notice a statement that a transfer of registration may also be done at the supplemental registration.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1978, ch. 941, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-214; Acts 1994, ch. 919, § 6.

Cross-References. Newspaper of general circulation defined, §2-1-104..

2-2-115. Registration by mail — Forms.

Qualified voters may register by mail by use of postal card forms in such a manner as provided for in this section.

The coordinator of elections shall prepare voter registration forms in accordance with the provisions of this section and shall provide for the printing of an ample quantity of such registration forms to be distributed under the provisions of this section.

Printed registration forms shall be designed to provide a simple method of registering by mail to vote. Registration forms shall include such matter as the coordinator of elections requires to ascertain the qualifications of an individual applying to register under this section and to prevent fraudulent registration.

Registration notification forms advising the applicant of the acceptance or rejection of the applicant's registration shall be completed and mailed by the county election commission to the applicant. If any registration notification form is undeliverable, it shall not be forwarded to another address but shall be returned to the county election commission mailing the form. If any registration notification form is returned as undeliverable and indicates an acceptance of a voter's registration, the administrator of elections shall mail a forwardable confirmation notice to the registrant at the address of registration with a postage prepaid, pre-addressed return form on which the voter may verify or correct the address information. Upon the mailing of the confirmation notice, the administrator of elections shall place the registration in inactive status pursuant to § 2-2-106(d).

The coordinator of elections or any county election commission is authorized to enter into agreements with the postal service and with departments and agencies of the federal government or appropriate state or local agencies, for the distribution of the registration forms, or to arrange for the distribution of such forms so as to effectuate the purpose of this section.

Whenever a state or county official has reason to believe that individuals who are not qualified voters are attempting to register to vote under this chapter, such official shall notify the coordinator of elections and request the assistance of the coordinator of elections to prevent the fraudulent registration. The coordinator of elections shall give such reasonable and expeditious assistance as the coordinator deems appropriate in such cases.

If a state or county official determines that there is a pattern of fraudulent registration, or any activities on the part of any individuals to vote who are not qualified voters, the coordinator of elections shall request the district attorney general within whose district these actions may occur, to bring action under this section. The district attorney general shall bring civil action in any appropriate court in Tennessee to secure an order to prevent fraudulent registration.

Each person who registers by mail shall appear in person to vote in the first election the person votes in after such registration becomes effective. Before voting at the appropriate polling place or election commission office, such person shall present satisfactory proof of identity.

The requirement to appear in person to vote in the first election shall not apply to:

A person who is on the permanent absentee voting register; or

A person who is in the address confidentiality program under title 40, chapter 38, part 6.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1975, ch. 308, § 1; 1977, ch. 218, §§ 1, 2; 1978, ch. 508, § 1; 1978, ch. 941, § 2; 1979, ch. 302, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 306, §§ 11, 21; T.C.A., § 2-215; Acts 1980, ch. 580, § 1; 1980, ch. 638, § 7; 1981, ch. 478, § 6; 1983, ch. 157, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 413, § 1; 1989, ch. 274, § 1; 1991, ch. 34, § 1; 1993, ch. 379, § 1; 1994, ch. 859, § 12; 1994, ch. 919, §§ 7-12, 33; 2000, ch. 756, § 2; 2011, ch. 412, § 1; 2018, ch. 1004, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 1004, § 4 provided that the secretary of state is authorized to promulgate rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to implement the provisions of this act.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, effective March 1, 2019, added (b)(7)(B); in present (b)(7)(A), substituted “. Before” for “; before” following “effective” and deleted the former last sentence which read: “This subdivision (b)(7) does not apply to a person who is on the permanent absentee voting register.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1004, § 5. March 1, 2019; provided, that for the purpose of promulgating rules, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

Cross-References. Early voting, title 2, ch. 6, part 1.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N.L. Resener, J.A. Whitson, K.J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

2-2-116. Registration form.

The permanent registration record shall be substantially as follows, shall contain all the information required before being signed by the registrant, and shall be witnessed as indicated on the form.

PERMANENT REGISTRATION RECORD

1.

Last Name First Name Middle Name Sex

2. Legal Residence

Number Street or Road Apt.

3. City County

4. Mailing Address if different from Legal Residence.

5. Social Security number, if any

6. Date and place of birth

7. Are you a citizen of the United States?

8. Where were you last registered to vote? City County State

9. Are you a resident of the State of Tennessee?

10. Have you ever been convicted of a crime which is a felony in this state, by a court in this state, a court in another state, or a federal court?

11. If the answer to question ten (10) is “yes,” list the crime, or crimes, for which you were convicted, and date, or dates, of conviction.

12. If the answer to question ten (10) is “yes,” have you received a pardon or had your full rights of citizenship restored by a court for all crimes listed?

State of Tennessee

ss

County of

I, being duly sworn on oath (or affirmation) declare that the above address is my legal residence and that I plan to remain at such residence for an undetermined period of time and say that to the best of my knowledge and belief all of the foregoing statements made by me are true.

Signature of Applicant

If the registrant signs by a mark, or cannot sign at all, fill in the following information:

Sworn to and subscribed to before me

this day of , 20 ,

Signature of Administrator of Elections or

other person taking affidavit

Official Position

Registered as voter in District Ward

Precinct effective .

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1978, ch. 941, § 3; T.C.A., § 2-216; Acts 1981, ch. 337, § 1; 1981, ch. 345, § 5; 1989, ch. 274, § 2; 1994, ch. 919, §§ 13-15; 2001, ch. 413, § 12; 2002, ch. 698, § 4; 2008, ch. 928, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Cross-References. Acts purging registration, §2-2-106.

Duties of election coordinator, §2-11-202.

Judgment of infamy, §40-20-112.

Notice of infamy, §40-20-113.

Qualified voters, §2-2-102.

Restoration of suffrage, §§2-2-139,40-29-101.

Suffrage for persons convicted of infamous crimes, §2-19-143.

2-2-117. Voting record form.

On the back of each registration form (or on a separate form if an alternate electronic registration system is used), there shall be printed a ten-year voting record form substantially as follows:

VOTING RECORDName of Voter

YEAR PARTY General Primary Other

Election Election Elections

Ballot No. or Ballot No. or Ballot No. or

Ballot Ballot Ballot

Application Application Application

Number Number Number

1971

1972

Continued for

remainder of

ten (10) years

The year dates printed in the first column shall be changed with each year's printing of the form.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-217; Acts 1984, ch. 935, §§ 1, 6; 1989, ch. 590, § 1; 1994, ch. 919, § 16.